Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1946YH (4) 91 ss/ns H.F. 157 Section 1. Section 372.13, subsection 2, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (2), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 If the council chooses to proceed under this paragraph, 4 it shall publish notice in the manner prescribed by section 5 362.3 , stating that the council intends to fill the vacancy by 6 appointment but that the electors of the city or ward, as the 7 case may be, have the right to file a petition requiring that 8 the vacancy be filled by a special election if the remaining 9 balance of the unexpired term is at least one year . The 10 council may publish notice in advance if an elected official 11 submits a resignation to take effect at a future date. The 12 council may make an appointment to fill the vacancy after the 13 notice is published or after the vacancy occurs, whichever is 14 later. However, if within fourteen days after publication 15 of the notice or within fourteen days after the appointment 16 is made, there is filed with the city clerk a petition which 17 requests a special election to fill the vacancy and the 18 remaining balance of the unexpired term is at least one year , 19 an appointment to fill the vacancy is temporary and the council 20 shall call a special election to fill the vacancy permanently, 21 under paragraph âbâ . The number of signatures of eligible 22 electors of a city for a valid petition shall be determined as 23 follows: 24